Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-918
Facility or programs for treatment of mental illness, substance dependence, or personality disorders; voluntary admission; unconditional discharge; exception.

Any person may voluntarily apply for admission to any public or private hospital, other treatment facility, or program for treatment of mental illness, substance dependence, or personality disorders in accordance with the regulations of such facilities or programs governing such admissions. Any person who is voluntarily admitted for such treatment shall be unconditionally discharged from such hospital, treatment facility, or program not later than forty-eight hours after delivery of his or her written request to any official of such hospital, treatment facility, or program, unless action is taken under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act to continue his or her custody.

Laws 1976, LB 806, § 29;

Laws 1978, LB 501, § 1;

Laws 1985, LB 252, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 884, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 83-1019;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 38;

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 37.

Sex Offender Commitment Act, see section 71-1201.